Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202686-1067
Rules and regulations.

The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the 911 Service System Act.

Laws 2018, LB993, § 16;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-1029.03;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 49.